North Carolina, session 2025, SB1021.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of five hundred forty-five thousand five hundred eighty-eight
dollars ($545,588) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant
to the Town of Pineville for the construction of a pedestrian hybrid beacon and a crosswalk across
Hwy 51 and Main St. at the Town Hall to increase pedestrian safety and contribute to the
walkability of the Town.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S1021-v-1*